Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 13, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended  by section 7, chapter 107,
Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  There are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, from the Veterans’  Ser-
vices Fund, to the Veterans’ Department  of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lottery Fund, the following
amounts for the following purposes:
(1) [Veterans’ Services Program ........... $ 8,176,492]
Veterans’ Services Program ..... $ 8,378,042
(2) County Veterans’ Service
Officers ................................................$ 6,904,151
(3) National Service
Organizations ..................................... $ 118,156
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5543 (SB 5543-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 12, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House April 1, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5543 (SB 5543-A) Page 2